Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1601.02
County treasurer; deputy; appointment; oath; duties.

The county treasurer may appoint a deputy for whose acts he or she will be responsible. The treasurer may not appoint the county clerk, sheriff, register of deeds, or surveyor as deputy.

The appointment shall be in writing and revocable in writing by the treasurer. Both the appointment and revocation shall be filed and kept in the office of the county clerk.

The deputy shall take the same oath as the treasurer which shall be endorsed upon and filed with the certificate of appointment. The treasurer may require a bond of the deputy.

In the absence or disability of the treasurer, the deputy shall perform the duties of the treasurer pertaining to the office, but when the treasurer is required to act in conjunction with or in place of another officer, the deputy cannot act in the treasurer's place.

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 6.